Massachusetts, session 194th, H2422.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The department of public health, in consultation with the Massachusetts
Chapter of the American Parkinson Disease Association, shall establish a Parkinson's disease
public information and education program to promote public awareness of Parkinson's disease
and the value of early detection.
The department's outreach campaign shall include, but is not limited to, the following
subjects:
(i) the cause and nature of the disease; (ii) diagnostic procedures and appropriate
indications for their use; (iii) lifestyle issues relating to how a person copes with Parkinson's
disease, including, but not limited to, nutrition, diet, and physical exercise; (iv) environmental
of 2

safety and injury prevention; and (v) availability of Parkinson's disease diagnostic and
treatment services in the community.
Section 2. The department of public health shall develop informational booklets about
Parkinson's disease and make the booklets available to all licensed health care facilities engaged
in the diagnosis or treatment of Parkinson's disease, as well as, to health care professionals,
community health centers, and members of the public upon their request. The department shall
publicize and make available the booklet to the maximum extent possible, and shall make the
booklet available electronically on its Internet website in English and Spanish. This information
may be revised by the department whenever new information about Parkinson's disease becomes
available.
Section 3. The department of public health shall develop educational programs for other
personnel, including judicial staff, police officers, fire fighters, and social services and
emergency medical service providers, to assist them in recognizing the symptoms of Parkinson's
disease and understanding how to respond to the needs of persons with the disease in the course
of performing their duties, including dissemination of the informational booklet mandated by
Section 2 of this chapter.
Section 4. The department of public health shall create and maintain a list of current
providers of specialized services for the diagnosis and treatment of Parkinson's disease.
Dissemination of the list shall be accompanied by a description of diagnostic procedures. The
statement shall also indicate that the department does not endorse specific Parkinson's disease
programs or centers in this State.
Section 5. This act shall take effect on the 180th day following enactment.
of 2